Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1975.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702.1 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2702.1. Assault of [law enforcement officer] emergency responder.(a) Assault of [a law enforcement officer] emergency responder.--(1) A person commits a felony of the first degree who attempts to cause or intentionally or knowingly causes bodily injury to [a law enforcement officer] an emergency responder, while in the performance of duty and with knowledge that the victim is [a law enforcement officer] an emergency responder, by discharging a firearm.1234567891011121314151617 (2) Except as provided under sections 2703 (relating to assault by prisoner), 2703.1 (relating to aggravated harassment by prisoner) and 2704 (relating to assault by life prisoner), a person is guilty of a felony of the third degree if the person intentionally or knowingly causes or attempts to cause [a law enforcement officer] an emergency responder, while in the performance of duty and with knowledge that the victim is [a law enforcement officer] an emergency responder, to come into contact with blood, seminal fluid, saliva, urine or feces by throwing, tossing, spitting or expelling the fluid or material.(3) A person who commits an offense under paragraph (2) shall be guilty of a felony of the second degree if:(i) the person knew, had reason to know, should have known or believed the fluid or material to have been obtained from an individual, including the person charged under this section, infected by a communicable disease declared reportable by regulation authorized by the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955; and(ii) the communicable disease referenced in subparagraph (i) is communicable to the [law enforcement officer] emergency responder by the method used or attempted to be used to cause the [law enforcement officer] emergency responder to come into contact with the blood, seminal fluid, saliva, urine or feces.(b) Penalties.--Notwithstanding section 1103(1) (relating to sentence of imprisonment for felony), a person convicted under subsection (a)(1) shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment fixed by the court at not more than 40 years.20250HB1975PN2494 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:["Law enforcement officer." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "peace officer" is given under section 501 (relating to definitions).]"Emergency responder." As defined under 35 Pa.C.S. § 75A01 (relating to definitions)."Firearm." As defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9712(e) (relating to sentences for offenses committed with firearms).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1975PN2494 - 3 - 1234567891011